Illinois, session 104th, SB3948.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Bingo License and Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 25/2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1102)7    Sec. 2. The conducting of bingo is subject to the 8following restrictions: 9        (1) The entire net proceeds from bingo play must be 10    exclusively devoted to the lawful purposes of the 11    organization permitted to conduct that game.12        (2) (Blank).13        (2.5) No person except a bona fide member or employee 14    of the sponsoring organization or a volunteer who is not a 15    paid bona fide member of the sponsoring organization may 16    participate in the management or operation of bingo. 17        (3) No person may receive any remuneration or profit 18    for participating in the management or operation of the 19    game, except that if an organization licensed under this 20    Act is associated with a school or other educational 21    institution, that school or institution may reduce tuition 22    or fees for a designated pupil based on participation in 23    the management or operation of the game by any member of   SB3948- 2 -LRB104 18519 LNS 31961 b1    the organization. The extent to which tuition and fees are 2    reduced shall relate proportionately to the amount of time 3    volunteered by the member, as determined by the school or 4    other educational institution.5        (4) The aggregate retail value of all prizes or 6    merchandise awarded in any single day of bingo may not 7    exceed $2,250, except that in adjoining counties having 8    200,000 to 275,000 inhabitants each, and in counties which 9    are adjacent to either of such adjoining counties and are 10    adjacent to a total of not more than 2 counties in this 11    State, and in any municipality having 2,500 or more 12    inhabitants and within one mile of such adjoining and 13    adjacent counties having less than 25,000 inhabitants, 2 14    additional bingo games may be conducted after the $2,250 15    limit has been reached. The prize awarded for any one 16    game, including any game conducted after reaching the 17    $2,250 limit as authorized in this paragraph (4), may not 18    exceed $500 cash or its equivalent.19        (5) The number of games, including regular and special 20    games, may not exceed 25 in any one day, except that this 21    restriction on the number of games shall not apply to 22    bingo conducted at the Illinois State Fair or any county 23    fair held in Illinois.24        (6) The price paid for a single card under the license 25    may not exceed $1.79 $1 and such card is valid for all 26    regular games on that day of bingo. A maximum of 5 special   SB3948- 3 -LRB104 18519 LNS 31961 b1    games may be held on each bingo day, except that this 2    restriction on the number of special games shall not apply 3    to bingo conducted at the Illinois State Fair or any 4    county fair held in Illinois. The price for a single 5    special game card may not exceed 50 cents.6        (7) The number of bingo days conducted by a licensee 7    under this Act is limited to one per week, except as 8    follows:9            (i) Bingo may be conducted in accordance with the 10        terms of a special operator's permit or limited 11        license issued under subdivision (7) or (8) of Section 12        1.3.13            (ii) Bingo may be conducted at the Illinois State 14        Fair or any county fair held in Illinois under 15        subdivision (6) of Section 1.3.16            (iii) A licensee which cancels a day of bingo 17        because of inclement weather or because the day is a 18        holiday or the eve of a holiday may, after giving 19        notice to the Department, conduct bingo on an 20        additional date which falls on a day of the week other 21        than the day authorized under the license.22        (8) A licensee may rent a premises on which to conduct 23    bingo only from an organization which is licensed as a 24    provider of premises or exempt from license requirements 25    under this Act. If the organization providing the premises 26    is a metropolitan exposition, auditorium, and office   SB3948- 4 -LRB104 18519 LNS 31961 b1    building authority created by State law, a licensee may 2    enter into a rental agreement with the organization 3    authorizing the licensee and the organization to share the 4    gross proceeds of bingo games; however, the organization 5    shall not receive more than 50% of the gross proceeds.6        (9) No person under the age of 18 years may play or 7    participate in the conducting of bingo. Any person under 8    the age of 18 years may be within the area where bingo is 9    being played only when accompanied by his parent or 10    guardian.11        (10) The promoter of bingo games must have a 12    proprietary interest in the game promoted.13        (11) Raffles or other forms of gambling prohibited by 14    law shall not be conducted on the premises where bingo is 15    being conducted, except that pull tabs and jar games 16    conducted under the Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act 17    may be conducted on the premises where bingo is being 18    conducted. Prizes awarded in pull tabs and jar games shall 19    not be included in the bingo prize limitation.20        (12) Organizations may be issued a special permit or 21    limited license no more than 2 times in any year. An 22    organization holding a special operator's permit or a 23    limited license may, as one of the occasions allowed by 24    such permit or license, conduct bingo for a maximum of 2 25    consecutive days. If an organization conducts bingo 26    pursuant to a limited license or special permit, then the   SB3948- 5 -LRB104 18519 LNS 31961 b1    number of games played during each day may exceed 25, and 2    regular game cards need not be valid for all regular 3    games. If only noncash prizes are awarded during such 4    occasions, the prize limits stated in paragraph 5    subdivision (4) of this Section shall not apply, provided 6    that the retail value of noncash prizes for any single 7    game shall not exceed $150.8(Source: P.A. 95-228, eff. 8-16-07.)